Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.640

Office to coordinate state participation within student exchange compact programs—Designate certifying officer.

The office is hereby specifically directed to develop such state plans as are necessary to coordinate the state of Washington's participation within the student exchange compact programs under the auspices of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education, as provided by chapter 28B.70 RCW. In addition to establishing such plans the office shall designate the state certifying officer for student programs.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 120; 1985 c 370 s 17; 1974 ex.s. c 4 s 3. Formerly RCW 28B.80.150.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 4: "If any provision of this 1973 [1974] act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 4 s 6.]